cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX i   zić       żeniami   [aęou]zić
SFX i   zić       żeniom    [aęou]zić
SFX i   zić       żeniach   [aęou]zić
SFX i   zić       żeń       [aęou]zić
SFX i   ździć     żdżenia   ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżenie   ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeniem  ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeniu   ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeniami ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeniom  ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeniach ździć
SFX i   ździć     żdżeń     ździć
SFX i   ść        dzenia    łaść
SFX i   ść        dzenie    łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeniem   łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeniu    łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeniami  łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeniom   łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeniach  łaść
SFX i   ść        dzeń      łaść
SFX i   ść        dnięcia   [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięcie   [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięciem  [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięciu   [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięciami [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięciom  [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięciach [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięć     [pr]aść
SFX i   ść        dnięcia   iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięcie   iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięciem  iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięciu   iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięciami iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięciom  iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięciach iąść
SFX i   ść        dnięć     iąść
SFX i   ąść       ędzenia   ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzenie   ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeniem  ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeniu   ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeniami ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeniom  ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeniach ząść
SFX i   ąść       ędzeń     ząść
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięcia  ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięcie  ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięciem ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięciu  ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięciami ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięciom ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięciach ąźć
SFX i   ąźć       ęźnięć    ąźć
SFX i   ść        cenia     [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        cenie     [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceniem    [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceniu     [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceniami   [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceniom    [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceniach   [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        ceń       [mn]ieść
SFX i   ść        dzenia    jeść
SFX i   ść        dzenie    jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeniem   jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeniu    jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeniami  jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeniom   jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeniach  jeść
SFX i   ść        dzeń      jeść
SFX i   ść        cenia     leść
SFX i   ść        cenie     leść
SFX i   ść        ceniem    leść
SFX i   ść        ceniu     leść
SFX i   ść        ceniami   leść
SFX i   ść        ceniom    leść
SFX i   ść        ceniach   leść
SFX i   ść        ceń       leść
SFX i   ść        ścia      jść
SFX i   ść        ście      jść
SFX i   ść        ściem     jść
SFX i   ść        ściu      jść
SFX i   ść        ściami    jść
SFX i   ść        ściom     jść
SFX i   ść        ściach    jść
SFX i   ść        ść        jść
SFX i   óść       ośnięcia  óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięcie  óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięciem óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięciu  óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięciami óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięciom óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięciach óść
SFX i   óść       ośnięć    óść
SFX i   yć        enia      yć
SFX i   yć        enie      yć
SFX i   yć        eniem     yć
SFX i   yć        eniu      yć
SFX i   yć        eniami    yć
SFX i   yć        eniom     yć
SFX i   yć        eniach    yć
SFX i   yć        eń        yć

SFX e Y 28
SFX e   ąc        ęknięto   ląc
SFX e   ąc        ęgnięto   siąc
SFX e   0         zono      [il]ec
SFX e   c         żono      rz[ey]c
SFX e   0         zono      łuc
SFX e   ć         no        [^ąeiśuyź]ć
SFX e   ąć        ęto       [dijlż]ąć
SFX e   ąć        ięto      [^sz]nąć
SFX e   znąć      źnięto    znąć
SFX e   snąć      śnięto    snąć
SFX e   eć        ano       cieć
SFX e   leć       ielono    leć
SFX e   eć        ano       rzeć
SFX e   eć        ano       [^csz]ieć
SFX e   eć        ano       sieć
SFX e   eć        ano       zieć
SFX e   ć         to        [bnpw]ić
SFX e   ić        jono      [ae]ić
SFX e   ić        ono       cić
SFX e   ć         ono       [sz]ić
SFX e   ść        siono     paść
SFX e   ąść       ęsiono    ząść
SFX e   ść        dnięto    iąść
SFX e   ść        siono     nieść
SFX e   ść        dziono    wieść
SFX e   óść       odzono    óść
SFX e   ć         to        [uy]ć
SFX e   źć        ziono     źć
