cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
afirmować/BEGHJej
alkoholizować/BEGHJej
animować/BEGHJej
aranżować/BEGHJej
autolizować/BEGHJej
bałykować/BGHJej
barwić/BEHIdikv
benchmarkować/BEGHJej
biwakować/BGHJej
błądzić/HIdikv
bodnąć/BEFIej
briefować/BEGHJej
bryznąć/BFJeij
bumblować/BGHJej
capić/EHIdikv
cementować/BEGHJej
chloroformować/BEGHJej
chłodzić/BEHIdikv
chrupać/BEHIejv
ciaprać/EHIdikv
ciepnąć/BEFIej
cokać/HIdikv
cyrkulować/BEGHJej
czochać/EHIdikv
ćwierknąć/BFIej
dedukować/BEGHJej
dekapitalizować/BEGHJej
delabializować/BEGHJej
denominować/BEGHJej
derdać/HIdikv
derknąć/BFIej
dezaktywizować/BEGHJej
dissować/BEGHJej
dochrzaniać/EHIdikv
doczołgiwać/BGHJej
dogadać/EHIdik
dohamowywać/BEGHJej
dojechać/BEHJdi
dokooptowywać/BEGHJej
dokupić/EHIdik
domalowywać/BEGHJej
domawiać/EHIdikv
dopiłować/BEHJej
doplatać/EHIdikv
dorżnąć/BEFIej
doskonalić/EHIdikv
doszlusować/BHJej
doświetlać/EHIdikv
dotruć/BEHJej
doziębiać/EHIdikv
drapnąć/BEFIej
dumpingować/BEGHJej
dyskwalifikować/BEGHJej
dziedziczyć/EHIdikv
dziurawieć/BHIejv
eksperymentować/BGHJej
emanować/BEGHJej
estetyzować/BEGHJej
falować/BEGHJej
felietonować/BGHJej
flambirować/BEGHJei
forsować/BEGHJej
frustrować/BEGHJej
gadać/EHIdikv
gasnąć/BGHJej
glebnąć/BFIej
gruzować/BEGHJdi
grzebać/BEGHJej
hieratyzować/BEGHJej
improwizować/BEGHJej
interweniować/BGHJej
jednoczyć/EHIdikv
kaligrafować/BEGHJej
kaszlnąć/BFIej
kleić/BEHIdiv
klęsnąć/BFGHJej
komentować/BEGHJej
kontenerować/BEGHJej
kożuchować/BEGHJej
kruczyć/HIdikv
kuleczkować/BEGHJej
lampić/HIdikv
lawować/BEGHJej
logarytmować/BEGHJej
majsterkować/BGHJej
markocić/HIdikv
megafonizować/BEGHJej
miodować/BEGHJej
mniemać/EHIdikv
mundurować/BEGHJej
nabrechtać/HIdik
nadać/EHdhik
nadbudowywać/BEGHJej
nadpocząć/BEHIdi
nadrzemać/BHJej
naginać/EHIdikv
nahałasować/BHJej
nakładać/EHIdikv
namiażdżyć/EHIdik
namleć/ejk
napasać/EHIdikv
naprzeciągać/EHIdik
napuchnąć/BFHIej
narzygać/HIdik
nastopyrczyć/EHIdik
naszpicować/BEHJej
natachać/HIdik
nawarstwić/BEHIdik
nawydziwiać/EHIdik
nażłopać/BHIej
nażreć/HJdik
obczepić/EHIdik
obczęstowywać/BEGHJej
obklejać/EHIdikv
oblizać/BEHJej
obostrzać/EHIdikv
obsiać/BEHJej
obsmyczać/EHIdikv
obuwać/EHIdikv
obwiązać/BEHJej
ociosać/BEHIJdik
odbiegnąć/BHIej
odchudzać/EHIdikv
odeskortować/BEHJej
odębieć/BHIdi
odhumanizować/BEHJej
odklikać/EHIdik
odlajkować/BEHJej
odmiejscawiać/EHIdikv
odpalantować/BEHJej
odpieprzyć/EHIdik
odptaszkować/BEHJej
odpychać/EHIdikv
odsłowiańszczyć/EHIdik
odstęknąć/BEFIej
odtajnić/BEHIdi
odtentegować/BEHJej
odwłaszać/EHIdikv
ofuknąć/BEFIej
ogłosić/EHIdik
okręcić/EHIdik
okupować/BEGHJej
omywać/EHIdikv
opisywać/BEGHJej
opłużać/EHIdikv
oryglowywać/BEGHJej
osiągać/EHIdikv
oswoić/EHIdik
oszczypywać/BEGHJej
otruwać/EHIdikv
owłosić/HIdeik
parkać/HIdikv
parkować/BEGHJej
peryfrazować/BEGHJej
pitrasić/EHIdikv
plakatować/BEGHJej
pobiwakować/BHJej
pobłogosławić/EHIdik
pochwycić/EHIdik
pocieniować/BEHJej
podchlebiać/EHIdikv
podemknąć/BEFIej
podhaczyć/EHIdik
podlatywać/BGHJej
podłatać/EHIdik
podopinać/EHIdik
podpowiedzieć/EHJejk
podrałować/BHJei
podsygnować/BEHJej
podszeptać/BEHIJdik
podzlecać/EHIdikv
poegzystować/BHJej
pogruchać/HIdik
pohandlować/BHJej
poklecić/EHIdik
pokochiwać/BEGHJej
pokwiczeć/HJdik
polampartować/BHJei
pomianować/BEHJei
pomiarkować/BEHJej
ponadkruszać/EHIdik
ponawiercać/EHIdik
poobsuwać/EHIdik
poociosywać/BEHJej
poodrzucać/EHIdik
pootaczać/EHIdik
popleć/Eejk
popłoszyć/EHIdik
poprzedstawiać/EHIdik
poprzeziębiać/HIdik
popyskować/BHJei
porozpalać/EHIdik
poruczyć/EHIdik
poserfować/BHJei
posmarkać/BEHIJdik
postrzec/BEHIej
posuszyć/EHIdik
poślubić/EHIdik
poświstywać/BGHJej
potwierdzać/EHIdikv
poustalać/EHIdik
powetować/BEHJej
powielić/EHIdik
powściągać/EHIdikv
powykręcać/EHIdik
powyłamywać/BEHJej
powyprażać/EHIdik
powytyczać/EHIdik
pozadzierać/EHIdik
pozapełniać/EHIdik
pozapoznawać/EHJejk
pozawadzać/HIdik
pozmarzać/HIdik
pożegnać/EHIdik
półkoksować/BEGHJej
promienieć/BHIejv
przebłyskać/HIdikv
przebóść/EHJejk
przećpać/EHIdik
przedramatyzować/BEHJej
przegazowywać/BEGHJej
przegramolić/HIdik
przeklasyfikowywać/BEGHJei
przekonstruowywać/BEGHJei
przelęknąć/BFHIej
przemądrzać/HIdikv
przemykiwać/BGHJej
przepędzać/EHIdikv
przeprofilowywać/BEGHJei
przeradzać/EHIdikv
przesmarowywać/BEGHJej
przestudzać/EHIdikv
prześpiewywać/BEGHJej
przetłumaczyć/EHIdik
przewiązać/BEHJej
przewracać/EHIdikv
przyciszać/EHIdikv
przycwaniakować/BHJej
przygonić/EHIdik
przykłusować/BHJej
przyłazić/HIdikv
przypędzać/EHIdikv
przypieczętować/BEHJej
przysalać/EHIdikv
przysztukowywać/BEGHJei
przyświecać/HIdikv
przywodzić/BEHIdiv
psychoanalizować/BEGHJej
reaktywizować/BEGHJej
rekompensować/BEGHJej
restrukturalizować/BEGHJej
retmanić/HIdikv
rozbetonowywać/BEGHJej
rozchwierutać/EHIdik
rozdeptywać/BEGHJej
rozelśnić/BEHIdi
rozgrzać/BEHJej
rozhultaić/HIdik
rozkrywać/EHIdikv
rozkwaterować/BEHJej
rozmawiać/HIdikv
rozpełznąć/BHIJdeij
rozpęczać/EHIdikv
rozpoznać/EHIdik
rozrechotać/BHJej
rozsądzać/EHIdikv
rozśrubowywać/BEGHJei
rozwierać/EHIdikv
runąć/BFIej
rzeźbić/BEHIdikv
samozapalić/HIdik
samplować/BEGHJej
sejmikować/BGHJej
sfarcić/HIdik
sformułować/BEHJej
skaperować/BEHJej
skłonić/EHIdik
skolonizować/BEHJej
skostnieć/BHIej
skrzesać/BEHIJdik
słynąć/BFIejv
spadać/HIdikv
spatologizować/BEHJej
spiętrzać/EHIdikv
spłowieć/BHIej
spowalniać/EHIdikv
sprecyzować/BEHJej
spuścić/EHIdik
starasować/BEHJej
strefnić/BHIdi
stretchować/BEGHJej
supportować/BEGHJej
szczenić/HIdikv
szerować/BEGHJej
szutrować/BEGHJej
ściszyć/EHIdik
taklować/BEGHJej
terroryzować/BEGHJej
tleć/BHIdiv
trollować/BEGHJej
twierdzić/HIdikv
ubłagiwać/BEGHJej
ubywać/HIdikv
udelikatniać/EHIdikv
ugaić/BEHIdi
ugałęziać/EHIejkv
uklasyczniać/EHIdikv
ukształtować/BEHJej
ulinić/EHIdik
umniejszyć/EHIdik
uniezależnić/BEHIdi
upierniczać/EHIdikv
upilnować/BEHJej
uprawniać/EHIdikv
uromantyczniać/EHIdikv
usługować/BGHJej
usłyszeć/EHJdik
uszczelinawiać/EHIdikv
uterenowić/BEHIdik
utylizować/BEGHJej
uweselać/EHIdikv
uwyraźnić/BEHIdi
walić/EHIdikv
watować/BEGHJej
weseleć/BHIdiv
westernizować/BEGHJej
wizualizować/BEGHJej
wkreślić/EHIdik
wojować/BGHJej
worywać/BEGHIJdikv
wrobić/EHIdik
wspawywać/BEGHJej
współprowadzić/EHIdikv
wtargnąć/BFIej
wtoczyć/EHIdik
wyboldować/BEHJej
wybraniać/EHIdikv
wychytrzyć/BEHIdik
wycudować/BEHJej
wydławiać/EHIdikv
wydrylowywać/BEGHJej
wygadać/EHIdik
wygarnirować/BEHJej
wyhandlować/BEHJei
wykadrować/BEHJej
wykłaszać/HIdikv
wykreować/BEHJej
wykulać/EHIdik
wyładować/BEHJej
wymadlać/EHIdikv
wymordować/BEHJej
wymulać/EHIdikv
wypaplać/EHIdhik
wypertraktować/BEHJej
wypłaszczyć/EHIdik
wyprocesować/BEHJej
wypukać/EHIdik
wyrozumować/BEHJej
wysferzać/HIdikv
wyspacerowywać/BEGHJej
wystarczać/HIdikv
wyszczuplić/BEHIdik
wyszpicować/BEHJej
wytężać/EHIdikv
wytrybować/BEHJej
wywąchać/EHIdik
wyznawać/EGHJejk
wyżarzyć/EHIdik
zaasfaltować/BEHJej
zabałaganić/EHIdik
zaburzać/EHIdikv
zacementować/BEHJej
zaciężyć/HIdik
zadecydować/BHJej
zadrwić/BHIdi
zafiskalizować/BEHJej
zagmatwać/EHIdik
zahamowywać/BEGHJej
zajeżdżać/EHIdikv
zajrzeć/BHJej
zakonspirowywać/BEGHJej
zakorzeniać/EHIdikv
zaleczać/EHIdikv
zalogowywać/BEGHJej
zamieszkać/EHIdik
zamustrować/BEHJej
zaobrębić/EHIdik
zapatrzeć/HJejk
zapierdzielić/EHIdik
zaprotestować/BEHJej
zaprzeć/BIejHdhi
zaryglowywać/BEGHJej
zarżeć/HJdi
zaspawać/EHIdik
zastrzec/BEHIej
zaszumiać/EHIdikv
zaśrubowywać/BEGHJej
zatoczyć/EHIdik
zawerniksować/BEHJej
zawieszać/EHIdikv
zażydzić/EHIdik
zbękarcieć/BHIej
zdarzać/HIdikv
zdebugować/BEHJej
zdemontowywać/BEGHJej
zdjęciować/BEGHJej
zepchnąć/BEFIej
zeprać/EHdi
ześcibić/EHIdik
ześrubowywać/BEGHJej
zgrabić/EHIdik
zgruzowywać/BEGHJej
zintegrować/BEHJej
zlec/BFdhi
zluzowywać/BEGHJej
zmetropolizować/BEHJej
zmęczyć/EHIdik
znaglić/BEHIdi
znerwicować/BEHJej
zreaktualizować/BEHJdi
zreasekurować/BEHJej
zrestytuować/BEHJej
zsowietyzować/BEHJej
zubażać/EHIdikv
związać/BEHJej
zwolnić/BEHIdi
żonglować/BEGHJej
